Nebraska, session 109, LB484.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB484 LB484
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-1359, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1359 The Legislature finds and declares that agricultural land
and horticultural land shall be a separate and distinct class of real
property for purposes of assessment. The assessed value of agricultural
land and horticultural land shall not be uniform and proportionate with
all other real property, but the assessed value shall be uniform and
proportionate within the class of agricultural land and horticultural
land.
For purposes of this section and section 77-1363:
(1) (1)(a) Agricultural land and horticultural land means a parcel
of land, excluding land associated with a building or enclosed structure
located on the parcel, which is primarily used for agricultural or
horticultural purposes, including wasteland lying in or adjacent to and
in common ownership or management with other agricultural land and
horticultural land; .
(b) Agricultural land and horticultural land does not include land
used for commercial purposes that are not agricultural or horticultural
purposes, such as land used for a solar farm or wind farm;
(2)(a) Agricultural or horticultural purposes means used for the
commercial production of any plant or animal product in a raw or
unprocessed state that is derived from the science and art of
agriculture, aquaculture, or horticulture.
(b) Agricultural or horticultural purposes includes the following
uses of land:
(i) Land retained or protected for future agricultural or
horticultural purposes under a conservation easement as provided in the
Conservation and Preservation Easements Act except when the parcel or a
portion thereof is being used for purposes other than agricultural or
horticultural purposes; and
(ii) Land enrolled in a federal or state program in which payments
-2-

LB484 LB484
2025 2025
are received for removing such land from agricultural or horticultural
production.
(c) Whether a parcel of land is primarily used for agricultural or
horticultural purposes shall be determined without regard to whether some
or all of the parcel is platted and subdivided into separate lots or
developed with improvements consisting of streets, sidewalks, curbs,
gutters, sewer lines, water lines, or utility lines;
(3) Farm home site means land contiguous to a farm site which
includes an inhabitable residence and improvements used for residential
purposes and which is located outside of urban areas or outside a platted
and zoned subdivision; and
(4) Farm site means the portion of land contiguous to land actively
devoted to agriculture which includes improvements that are agricultural
or horticultural in nature, including any uninhabitable or unimproved
farm home site.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-1359, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-